Tennessee, session 114, HB1938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 41, Chapter 24, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "local government" means a county, an incorporated
city or town, or a metropolitan government.
(b) After the effective date of this act, this state, including a department or
agency of this state, or a local government shall not enter into a new contract or renew
an existing contract for the provision of correctional services or facilities for an inmate in
the custody and care of the department of correction or the local government.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1938
011579
- 1 -